Utah statutes.
58-53-304.   Exemptions from licensure.
In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the
following may engage in the stated limited acts or practices without being
licensed under this chapter:
(1) a person preparing a site plan as defined in Subsection 58-53-102(3), for
a one-, two-, three-, or four-family residence not exceeding two stories in
height, exclusive of the basement;
(2) a person designing sprinkler irrigation systems when licensed as a
landscape contractor under Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades
Licensing Act;
(3)  a person licensed to practice professional engineering or professional
structural engineering under Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and
Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act;
(4)  a person licensed to practice architecture under Title 58, Chapter 3a,
Architects Licensing Act;
(5)  unlicensed employees of a person licensed under this chapter while
preparing site plans as defined in Subsection 58-53-102(3), under the
supervision of a landscape architect; and
(6)  an organization engaged in the practice of landscape architecture,
provided that:
(a)  the organization employs a principal; and
(b)  all individuals employed by the organization, who are engaged in the
practice of landscape architecture, are licensed or exempt from licensure
under this chapter.
